Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 3 MOTOR VEHICLE DRIVER’S LICENSES
§ 49-329. No operation under foreign license during suspension or revocation in Idaho.

No resident or nonresident whose driver’s license or right or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in Idaho has been suspended or revoked shall operate a motor vehicle in this state under a driver’s license, permit, or registration certificate issued by any other jurisdiction or otherwise during the suspension or after revocation until a new driver’s license is obtained when and as permitted under this chapter.

§ 49-330. Right of appeal to court.

Any person denied a driver’s license by the department or whose driver’s license has been cancelled, suspended, disqualified, revoked, or restricted by the department shall have the right to file a petition for judicial review pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 49-331. Unlawful use of driver’s license.

It is a misdemeanor for any person:

To display or cause or permit to be displayed or have in his possession any mutilated or illegible, cancelled, revoked, suspended, disqualified, fictitious or fraudulently altered driver’s license;

To lend his driver’s license to any other person or knowingly permit the use of his driver’s license by another;

To display or represent as one’s own a driver’s license not issued to him;

To fail or refuse to surrender to the department, upon its lawful demand, any driver’s license which has been suspended, revoked, disqualified or cancelled;

To use a false or fictitious name in any application for a driver’s license, or to knowingly make a false statement, or to knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise commit a fraud in any application;

To permit any unlawful use of a driver’s license issued to him; or

To manufacture, produce, sell, offer for sale or transfer to another person any document purporting to be a certificate of birth or driver’s license.

In addition to the misdemeanor penalties that may be imposed for violation of the provisions of paragraphs (1) through (7) of this section, the court upon conviction may enter an order directing the department to suspend the driver’s license, a permit to drive, privileges or any nonresident’s driving privileges for a period of ninety (90) days. A conviction under this section shall not be used as a factor or considered in any manner for the purpose of establishing rates of motor vehicle insurance charged by a casualty insurer, nor shall such conviction be grounds for nonrenewal of any insurance policy as provided in section 41-2507, Idaho Code.

§ 49-331A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-332. Making false affidavit perjury.

Any person who makes any false affidavit, or knowingly swears or affirms falsely to any matter or thing required by the provisions of this chapter to be sworn to or affirmed, is guilty of perjury and upon conviction shall be punished as provided by law.

§ 49-333. Prohibitions.

No person shall:

Cause or knowingly permit his child or ward under the age of eighteen (18) years to operate a motor vehicle upon any highway when the child or ward is not authorized under or is in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

Authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned by him or under his control to be operated upon any highway by any person who is not authorized under or is in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

Employ as a chauffeur of a motor vehicle any person not then licensed as provided in this chapter.

§ 49-334. Renting motor vehicle to another.

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to any other person unless the latter person is then licensed or, in the case of a nonresident, then licensed under the laws of the state or country of his residence, except a nonresident whose home state or country does not require that any operator be licensed.

No person shall rent a motor vehicle to another until he has inspected the driver’s license of the person to whom the vehicle is to be rented and compared and verified the signature thereon with the signature of the person written in his presence.

Every person renting a motor vehicle to another shall keep a record of the registration number of the motor vehicle so rented, the name and address of the person to whom the vehicle is rented, the number of the license of the latter person and the date and place when and where the license was issued. This record shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or officer or employee of the department.

§ 49-335. Disqualifications and penalties — Commercial driver’s license.

Any person who operates a commercial motor vehicle or who holds a class A, B or C driver’s license is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than one (1) year if convicted in the form of a judgment or withheld judgment of a first violation under any state or federal law of:

Operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance;

Operating a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration of the person’s blood, breath or bodily substance is 0.04 or more;

Leaving the scene of an accident involving a motor vehicle driven by the person;

Using a motor vehicle in the commission of any felony;

Operating a commercial motor vehicle when the person’s class A, B or C commercial driver’s license driving privileges were revoked, suspended or canceled, or during a time when such person was disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle, if the reason for such revocation, suspension, cancellation or disqualification was the result of a violation that occurred while the person was operating a commercial motor vehicle;

Causing a fatality through negligent operation of a commercial motor vehicle, including, but not limited to, the crimes of motor vehicle manslaughter, homicide by motor vehicle and negligent homicide.

Any person who operates a commercial motor vehicle or who holds a class A, B or C driver’s license is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than one (1) year if the person refuses to submit to or submits to and fails a test to determine the driver’s alcohol, drug or other intoxicating substances concentration while operating a motor vehicle.

If any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section occurred while transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded, the person is disqualified for a period of not less than three (3) years.

A person is disqualified for the period of time specified in 49 CFR part 383 if found to have committed two (2) or more of any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or any combination of those offenses, arising from two (2) or more separate incidents.

A person is disqualified for the period of time specified in 49 CFR part 383 from operating a commercial motor vehicle who uses a motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance, or possession of a controlled substance with the intent to manufacture, distribute or dispense such controlled substance.

A person is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than sixty (60) days if convicted of two (2) serious traffic violations, or one hundred twenty (120) days if convicted of three (3) or more serious traffic violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle arising from separate incidents occurring within a three (3) year period. A conviction for reckless driving shall be considered a serious traffic violation if committed while operating a commercial motor vehicle or a noncommercial motor vehicle, as specified in 49 CFR part 383.
(7) A person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle within this state while having any detectable amount of alcohol in his system or who refuses to submit to an alcohol test must be placed out of service for twenty-four (24) hours and be subject to the provisions of section 18-8002, Idaho Code.

One hundred eighty (180) days nor more than one (1) year for a first conviction;

Two (2) years nor more than five (5) years for a second conviction arising from separate incidents during any ten (10) year period;

Three (3) years nor more than five (5) years for three (3) or more convictions arising from separate incidents during any ten (10) year period.

(8) It is unlawful to violate an out-of-service order. A person who is convicted in the form of a judgment or withheld judgment of a violation of an out-of-service order while driving a commercial motor vehicle is disqualified for not less than:

(9) A person who is convicted in the form of a judgment or withheld judgment of a violation of an out-of-service order while driving a commercial motor vehicle and while transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded under the hazardous materials transportation act, or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen (16) or more people including the driver, is disqualified for not less than:

(a) One hundred eighty (180) days nor more than two (2) years for a first conviction;

(b) Three (3) years nor more than five (5) years for subsequent convictions arising from separate incidents in any ten (10) year period.

(10) A person is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle if convicted of a railroad grade crossing violation as specified in 49 CFR part 383 or applicable state laws while operating a commercial motor vehicle. The disqualification shall be for a period of:

(a) Sixty (60) days for a first conviction;

(b) One hundred twenty (120) days for a second conviction during any three (3) year period;

(c) One (1) year for a third or subsequent conviction during any three (3) year period.

(11) A person is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle if the federal motor carrier [safety] administration has determined the person’s driving constitutes an imminent hazard, as defined in 49 CFR 383.5.

(a) An imminent hazard disqualification may not exceed one (1) year in duration. The driver, or a representative on his or her behalf, may file an appeal of the disqualification with the assistant administrator, adjudications counsel, federal motor carrier safety administration.

(b) Any imminent hazard disqualification transmitted by the federal motor carrier safety administration shall become a part of the driver’s record.

(c) The imminent hazard disqualification shall run concurrent to any other existing disqualification.

(12) In addition to the disqualification periods in subsections (8) and (9) of this section, a driver who is convicted of violating an out-of-service order shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first conviction and not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any subsequent conviction.

§ 49-336. Nonresident commercial driver’s license.

The department shall issue a license in class A, B, or C or any endorsement, only to a person who is domiciled in this state; however, an applicant who is domiciled in a foreign country where the commercial motor vehicle operator testing and licensing standards do not meet the standards in accordance with 49 CFR part 383 may obtain a nonresident driver’s license from this state which meets such standards. The applicant for a nonresident driver’s license shall be required to comply with all provisions of this chapter, in the same manner as an Idaho resident.

The department shall add the word nonresident to the face of the commercial driver’s license of the nonresident driver.

§ 49-337. Employee and employer responsibilities.

Any operator of a commercial motor vehicle or any person who holds a class A, B or C driver’s license issued by this state, and who is convicted of violating any state law or local ordinance in any other state relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, such person shall notify the department of the conviction in the manner specified by the department within thirty (30) days of the date of conviction.

Any operator of a commercial motor vehicle or any person who holds a class A, B or C driver’s license issued by this state, and who is convicted of violating any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in this or any other state, other than parking violations, such person shall notify his employer in writing of the conviction within thirty (30) days of the date of conviction.

Each employee whose class A, B or C driver’s license is suspended, revoked, denied, refused or canceled by this state or who loses the privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in any state for any period, or who is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for any period, shall notify his employer of that fact before the end of the business day following the day the employee received notice of that fact.

Each person who applies for employment as an operator of a commercial motor vehicle with an employer shall provide notification to the employer, at the time of application, of his previous employment as an operator of a commercial motor vehicle. The period of previous employment of which notification must be given shall be the ten (10) year period ending on the date of application for employment.

No employer shall knowingly allow, permit, require or authorize an employee to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the United States during any period:

In which the employee has a driver’s license suspended, revoked or canceled by a state, has lost the privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in a state or has been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle; or

In which the employee has more than one (1) driver’s license; or

In which the employee, or the motor vehicle being driven, or the motor carrier operation, is subject to an out-of-service order.

An employer who is convicted of a violation of subsection (5)(c) of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($2,750) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

No employer shall knowingly allow, permit, require or authorize an employee to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the United States in violation of any federal, state or local law or federal regulation pertaining to railroad grade crossings. An employer who is convicted of a violation of this subsection (7) shall, in addition to the general penalties provided for in this title, be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Each employer shall require the information specified in subsection (4) of this section to be provided by the employee.

§ 49-338 — 49-341. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-342 — 49-345. Penalties — Interpretation — Title — Separability. [Repealed.]

§ 49-346. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-347. Chauffeur defined. [Repealed.]

§ 49-348. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-349. Remittance of fees. [Repealed.]

§ 49-350, 49-351. Duties of board — Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 49-352. Test of driver for blood alcohol. [Repealed.]

§ 49-353. Results of test available to operator. [Repealed.]

§ 49-354. Persons authorized to withdraw blood for the purpose of determining content of alcohol or other intoxicating substances. [Repealed.]

§ 49-355. Person tested selecting physician. [Repealed.]

§ 49-356 — 49-358. Driver rehabilitation and improvement programs. [Repealed.]